South Dakota, session 2026, SB191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 11-9-1 be AMENDED:
11-9-1. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Department," the Department of Revenue;
(2) "District," a tax increment financing district;
(3) "Governing body," the board of trustees, the board of commissioners, the board of
county commissioners, or the common council of a municipality;
(4) "Grant," the transfer of money or property to a transferee for a governmental
purpose that is not a related party to or an agent of the political subdivision;
(5) "Planning commission," a planning commission created under chapters chapter 11-
2 or 11-6, a planning committee of a governing body of a political subdivision that
does not have a planning commission, or the governing body of a political
subdivision that does not have a planning commission or planning committee;
(6)(5) "Political subdivision," a municipality, as defined in § 11-6-1, or county of this
state;
(7)(6) "Project plan," the properly approved plan for the development or redevelopment
of a tax increment financing district including and all properly approved
amendments to the plan;
(8)(7) "Tax increment financing district," a contiguous geographic area within a political
subdivision defined and created by resolution of the governing body;
(9)(8) "Taxable property," all real and personal taxable property located in a tax
increment financing district; and
(10)(9) "Tax increment valuation," the total value of the tax increment financing district
minus the tax increment base as determined pursuant to § 11-9-19.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.794.13 2 191
Section 2. That § 11-9-14 be AMENDED:
11-9-14. For the purposes of this chapter, the term "project costs" are mean any
expenditures made or estimated to be made, or monetary obligations incurred or
estimated to be incurred, by a political subdivision that, which are listed in a project plan
as grants or costs of public works or improvements within a district, plus any incidental
costs diminished by any income, special assessments, or other revenues, other than tax
increments, received, or reasonably expected to be received, by the political subdivision
in connection with the implementation of the plan.
Section 3. That § 11-9-15 be AMENDED:
11-9-15. For the purposes of this chapter, the term "project costs" means:
(1) Capital costs, including the actual costs of the construction of public works or
improvements, buildings, structures, and permanent fixtures; the demolition,
alteration, remodeling, repair, or reconstruction of existing buildings, structures,
and permanent fixtures; the acquisition of equipment; the clearing, over-
excavation, and grading of land, including use of engineered fill and soil
compaction; and the amount of interest payable on tax increment bonds issued
pursuant to this chapter until the positive tax increments to be received from the
district, as estimated by the project plan, are sufficient to pay the principal of and
interest on the tax increment bonds when due;
(2) Financing costs, including all interest paid to holders of evidences of indebtedness
issued to pay for project costs, any premium paid over the principal amount thereof
because of the redemption of obligations prior to maturity, and a reserve for the
payment of principal and interest on obligations in an amount determined by the
governing body to be reasonably required for the marketability of obligations;
(3) Real property assembly costs, including the actual cost of the acquisition by a
political subdivision of real or personal property within a district, less any proceeds
to be received by the political subdivision from the sale, lease, or other disposition
of property pursuant to a project plan;
(4) Professional service costs, including those costs incurred for architectural,
planning, engineering, and legal advice and services;
(5) Imputed administrative costs, including reasonable charges for the time spent by
a municipal or county employee in connection with the implementation of a project
plan;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.794.13 3 191
(6) Relocation costs;
(7) Organizational costs, including the costs of conducting environmental impact and
other studies and the costs of informing the public of the creation of a district and
the implementation of project plans; and
(8) Payments and grants made, at the discretion of the governing body, that are found
to be necessary or convenient to the creation of a district, the implementation of
project plans, or to stimulate and develop the general economic welfare and
prosperity of the state. No payment or grant may be used for any residential
structure pursuant to § 11-9-42Incidental costs diminished by any income, special
assessments, or other revenues, other than tax increments, received, or
reasonably expected to be received, by the political subdivision, in connection with
the implementation of the plan.
Section 4. That § 11-9-32 be AMENDED:
11-9-32. Moneys may only be paid out of the special fund only for the district
created under § 11-9-31 to pay project costs or grants of the district, to reimburse the
political subdivision for the payment of project costs or grants of the district, or to satisfy
claims of holders of tax increment bonds issued for the district.
Section 5. That § 11-9-46 be AMENDED:
11-9-46. The existence of a district shall terminate must be terminated when:
(1) Positive tax increments are no longer allocable to a district under § 11-9-25; or
(2) The governing body, by resolution, dissolves the district, after payment or
provision for payment of all project costs, grants, and all tax increment bonds of
the district.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.